Hawaii statutes.
[§482C-4] Lawful uses; defined. This
chapter shall not apply to any person who transfers or causes to be transferred
any sounds intended for or in connection with radio or television broadcast
transmission or related uses, for archival purposes, or solely for the personal
use of the person transferring or causing the transfer and with no purpose of
capitalizing commercially on such reproduction. [L 1975, c 81, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next